Utah statutes.
76-5-308.   Human trafficking.
(1)  An actor commits human trafficking for forced labor or forced sexual
exploitation if the actor recruits, harbors, transports, or obtains a person
through the use of force, fraud, or coercion by means of:
(a)  threatening serious harm to, or physical restraint against, that person
or a third person;
(b)  destroying, concealing, removing, confiscating, or possessing any
passport, immigration document, or other government identification document;
(c)  abusing or threatening abuse of the law or legal process against the
person or a third person;
(d)  using a condition of a person being a debtor due to a pledge of the
debtor's personal services or the personal services of a person under the
control of the debtor as a security for debt where the reasonable value of the
services is not applied toward the liquidation of the debt or the length and
nature of those services are not respectively limited and defined; or
(e)  using a condition of servitude by means of any scheme, plan, or pattern
intended to cause a person to believe that if the person did not enter into or
continue in a condition of servitude, that person or a third person would
suffer serious harm or physical restraint, or would be threatened with abuse
of legal process.
(2) (a)  Human trafficking for forced labor includes forced labor in
industrial facilities, sweatshops, households, agricultural enterprises, and
any other workplace.
(b)  Human trafficking for forced sexual exploitation includes all forms of
forced commercial sexual activity, including forced sexually explicit
performance, forced prostitution, forced participation in the production of
pornography, forced performance in strip clubs, and forced exotic dancing or
display.
